New York, session 2025-2026, A5212.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 510.10 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as amended by section 2 of part UU of chapter 56 3 of the laws of 2020, is amended and a new paragraph (j-1) is added to 4 read as follows: 5 (a) a felony enumerated in section 70.02 of the penal law[, other than 6 robbery in the second degree as defined in subdivision one of section 7 160.10 of the penal law], provided, however, that burglary in the second 8 degree as defined in subdivision two of section 140.25 of the penal law 9 shall be a qualifying offense only where the defendant is charged with 10 entering the living area of the dwelling; 11 (j-1) a crime which resulted in death or serious physical injury; 12 § 2. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 13 530.20 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by section 3 of part UU 14 of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is amended and a new subparagraph 15 (x-1) is added to read as follows: 16 (i) a felony enumerated in section 70.02 of the penal law[, other than 17 robbery in the second degree as defined in subdivision one of section 18 160.10 of the penal law], provided, however, that burglary in the second 19 degree as defined in subdivision two of section 140.25 of the penal law 20 shall be a qualifying offense only where the defendant is charged with 21 entering the living area of the dwelling; 22 (x-1) a crime which resulted in death or serious physical injury; 23 § 3. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 530.40 of the criminal 24 procedure law, as amended by section 4 of part UU of chapter 56 of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00628-01-5 A. 5212 2 1 laws of 2020, is amended and a new paragraph (j-1) is added to read as 2 follows: 3 (a) a felony enumerated in section 70.02 of the penal law[, other than 4 robbery in the second degree as defined in subdivision one of section 5 160.10 of the penal law], provided, however, that burglary in the second 6 degree as defined in subdivision two of section 140.25 of the penal law 7 shall be a qualifying offense only where the defendant is charged with 8 entering the living area of the dwelling; 9 (j-1) a crime which resulted in death or serious physical injury; 10 § 4. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 11 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law.